Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB5.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1360YC (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0t. Be subject to and comply with the 3 requirements of section 283A.6 relating to prohibited 4 ingredients in meals provided to students in the same manner as 5 a school district, if the charter school provides a breakfast 6 or lunch program. 7 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 8 by adding the following new paragraph: 9 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the 10 requirements of section 283A.6 relating to prohibited 11 ingredients in meals provided to students in the same manner 12 as a school district, if the charter school or innovation zone 13 school provides a breakfast or lunch program. 14 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 283A.6 School district breakfast and 15 lunch programs ââ prohibited ingredients. 16 A school district shall not serve a meal to students as 17 part of the school districtâs breakfast or lunch program that 18 contains any of the following ingredients: 19 1. Red dye 40. 20 2. Yellow dye 7. 21 3. Margarine. 22